California statutes. Elections Code
This committee shall conduct party campaigns for this party and in behalf of the candidates of this party. It shall appoint committees and appoint and employ campaign directors and perfect whatever campaign organizations it deems suitable or desirable and for the best interest of the party.

This committee shall have power to appoint interim county central committees in all counties in which the voters have not elected one or more county central committee members in the presidential primary preceding the organization of this committee. Persons appointed to interim county central committees pursuant to this section shall meet the qualifications otherwise required by Chapter 4 (commencing
 with Section 7650) for appointees to fill vacancies on county central committees. Notice of all appointments pursuant to this section shall be filed by the state central committee with the elections official of the county for which that interim county central committee is appointed. Interim county central committees appointed pursuant to this section shall have all of the powers and privileges afforded county central committees by the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7650), but members of interim county central committees shall not be designated as incumbents on the ballot in the succeeding primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 13.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7644.

A quorum of this committee is a majority of the entire membership, represented either in person or by proxy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7645.

The proceedings at all meetings of this committee shall be governed by any manual of parliamentary procedures designated by the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. County Central Committee [7650. - 7695.]



  ARTICLE 1. Members [7650. - 7661.]

7650.

In each county containing less than five Assembly districts or portions thereof, except the City and County of San Francisco, a county central committee of at least 25 members shall be elected by supervisor districts, and the number elected from each supervisor district shall be determined as follows:

The number of voters registered as members of the American Independent Party, as reflected in the statement of voters and their political affiliations transmitted to the Secretary of State on or before the 135th day
 before any primary election, shall be divided by 25. The number thus derived shall be divided into the number of American Independent Party voters registered in each supervisor district, and the integer nearest the resulting quotient shall be the number of central committee members to be elected to represent that supervisor district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.

In each county containing more than four Assembly districts or portions thereof, and the City and County of San Francisco, a county central committee shall be elected by Assembly districts, and the number elected shall be that number derived by multiplying 7 times the number of Assembly districts in whole or in part within the county. The number elected from each Assembly district shall be determined as follows:

The number of voters registered as members of the American Independent Party, as reflected in the statement
 of voters and their political affiliations transmitted to the Secretary of State on or before the 135th day before any primary election, shall be divided by the total number of members to be elected in the county. The number thus derived shall be divided into the number of American Independent Party voters registered in each Assembly district or portion thereof, and the integer nearest the resulting quotient shall be the number of central committee members to be elected to represent that Assembly district or portion thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.

The incumbent or nominee of each of the following offices shall be an ex officio member of the committee in the county in which he or she resides:

(a) Governor.

(b) Lieutenant Governor.

(c) Secretary of State.

(d) Controller.

(e) Treasurer.

(f) Attorney General.

(g) Member of the State Board of
 Equalization.

(h) United States Senator from California.

(i) Representative in Congress from California.

(j) All Members of the Legislature.

(k) Any person nominated to a partisan office at a special election to fill a vacancy in that office.

Ex officio members shall be entitled to all the rights and privileges, including the right to vote, and shall have the same standing in every way as other members of this committee, except they shall not be entitled to a ballot designation of incumbent upon seeking election to this committee in the next presidential primary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 14.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.

A committee may authorize any member of that committee, whether elected or ex officio, to appoint an alternate if a member desires to appoint an alternate. An incumbent of an elected partisan office at the time of the meeting of the committee may appoint an alternate member without authorization from that committee, if the member desires to appoint an alternate.

The alternate member shall have the right to vote only with the written authorization of the member who appointed him or her. An alternate member of a county
 central committee shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the committee.

An alternate member must meet the same qualifications as the regular member and may vote only in the absence of the member who appointed him or her.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7654.

A person shall not be eligible for appointment or election to a committee who is not registered as affiliated with this party at the time of his or her appointment or election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7656.

In the event that the candidates elected to a committee from a district do not equal the number of party committeepersons to which that district is entitled to be represented under this chapter, a vacancy or vacancies exist to the extent of the difference between the number of elected committeemembers and the number of committeemembers by which the district is entitled to be represented. When a vacancy or vacancies exist they shall be filled by the committee to which insufficient members were elected, in the manner provided for in Section
 7657.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7657.

In the event of the appointment or election to a committee of an ineligible person, or whenever any member of the committee dies, resigns or becomes incapacitated to act, or removes from the jurisdiction of the committee, or ceases to be a member of this party, a vacancy exists which shall be filled by appointment by the committee in which the ineligibility or vacancy occurs. A vacancy shall also exist on a committee when a member is removed from the committee pursuant to Section 7658 or 7660.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7658.

Any member, other than an ex officio member, of a committee who misses more than three consecutive regularly called meetings may be removed by a vote of the committee concerned, unless his or her absence is caused by illness or temporary absence from the county on the date of the meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.

The removal of residence by an elected or appointed member of a committee from the Assembly district or supervisor district from which he or she has been elected or appointed a member of that committee shall constitute his or her automatic resignation from the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7660.

A committee may remove any member who during his or her term of membership affiliates with, or registers as a member of another party.

A committee may remove any member, other than an ex officio member, who publicly advocates that the voters should not vote for the nominee of this party for any office, or who gives support or avows a preference for a candidate of another party who is opposed to a candidate nominated by this party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7661.

Whenever any person is appointed to fill a vacancy on a committee, the chairperson of the committee shall file notices of the appointment with the elections official and the chairperson of the state central committee within 30 days after it is made. The notices shall contain the name and address of the person appointed and the name of the person replaced, and shall indicate the date of the appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election [7670. - 7675.]

7670.

At every presidential primary election, a county central committee may be elected in each county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 15.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7671.

The Secretary of State, no later than 125 days before the presidential primary, shall compute the number of members of central committees to be elected in each county, and shall mail a certificate reporting that information to the elections official of each county and to the Chairperson of the American Independent Party State Central Committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 16.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.

In each county the name of each candidate for member of a committee shall appear upon the ballot only upon the filing of a nomination paper pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8020) to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8100), inclusive, of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 8, signed on his or her behalf by the voters of the Assembly or supervisorial district in which he or she is a candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 811, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7673.

If the elections official, on the 73rd day prior to the presidential primary election, finds that the number of candidates nominated for election to a committee from an Assembly or supervisor district does not exceed the number of candidates to be elected from that Assembly or supervisor district, the designation of the office and the names of the candidates shall not be printed on this party’s ballot in the Assembly or supervisor district. In lieu thereof, the board of supervisors shall declare elected the candidates who have been nominated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 17.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7674.

Whenever a candidate for election to a committee dies on or before the day of election, and a sufficient number of ballots are marked as being voted for him or her to entitle him or her to election if he or she had lived until after the election, a vacancy exists on the county central committee, which shall be filled by the committee in the same manner as other vacancies are filled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7675.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county central committee may select its members at any time by holding a caucus or convention in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the county central committee and the state central committee, or by using any other method of selection approved by the state central committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 18.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Meetings [7680. - 7683.]

7680.

Each committee shall meet at its county seat, upon call, which shall be given by the chairperson of the county central committee or the immediate predecessor of the current chairperson of the county committee on the second Tuesday in July following the presidential primary election, except that in any year in which a national convention of the party includes that date, the existing executive committee of a committee shall set the date of the meeting, not to exceed 30 days after the date herein specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 19.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7682.

The Department of General Services shall permit any committee that desires to do so to hold meetings in a state building within the county, at least one of which meetings each month shall be without charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7683.

All meetings of the committee shall be held in quarters that shall be accessible to persons with disabilities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Business [7690. - 7695.]

7690.

A committee shall have charge of the party campaign under general direction of the state central committee or of the executive committee selected by the state central committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7691.

A committee may make rules and regulations providing for any of the following:

(a) How officers of the committee may be removed.

(b) How meetings may be called.

(c) Whether or not proxies may be used and the conditions under which they may be used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7692.

The committee shall perform other duties and services for this political party as seem to be for the benefit of the party. They shall continue to function and exist until the election at the succeeding presidential primary, or the selection pursuant to Section 7675, and qualification of the members of the new committees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 20.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7693.

If the chairperson of a committee refuses to call a meeting, a meeting may be called upon five days’ notice by a majority of the members of the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7694.

Within five days after a committee meets for its organizational meeting, the newly elected chairperson of the committee shall notify the elections official of his or her name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 199, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7695.

Each committee may establish annual dues not to exceed twenty-four dollars ($24) per year for elected, ex officio and alternate members. The committee may remove members or alternates for nonpayment of dues.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. PEACE AND FREEDOM PARTY [7700. - 7884.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7700. - 7700.]

7700.

This part applies to the organization, operation, and functions of that political party known as the Peace and Freedom Party of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Members of Central Committees [7750. - 7784.]



  ARTICLE 1. Members [7750. - 7755.]

7750.

At each presidential primary election, members of central committees may be elected in each county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 21.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7751.

For the purposes of this chapter, the registration figures used shall be those taken from the statement of voters and their political affiliations transmitted by the elections officials to the Secretary of State on the 135th day prior to the next presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 22.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7752.

The number of members of central committees to be elected in a county shall be the greater of either of the following:

(a) The number seven.

(b) The integer nearest the resulting quotient obtained by dividing 400 times the number of Peace and Freedom Party registered voters in the county by the number of Peace and Freedom Party registered voters in the state.

However, the number of members
 of central committees to be elected in a county shall be five if the number of Peace and Freedom Party registered voters in the county is less than 150.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7753.

In each county where the number of members of central committees to be elected is 12 or less, the members shall be elected in a countywide, at large district. In each county where the number to be elected is 13 or greater, the members shall be elected by supervisorial district, except in Los Angeles County and in the City and County of San Francisco, wherein the members shall be elected by Assembly district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7754.

The number to be elected from each supervisorial or Assembly district shall be the greater of either of the following:

(a) The number one.

(b) The integer nearest the resulting quotient obtained by dividing the number of members to be elected in that county times the number of Peace and Freedom Party registered voters in the district by the number of Peace and Freedom Party registered voters in the county.

If the procedure outlined above would result in less members being elected in a county than the number to which the county is entitled under Section 7752, the calculation in subdivision (b) shall be repeated using a number of Peace and Freedom Party registered voters in the county sufficiently smaller than the actual number in the county so as to give a total number of members of central committees to be elected equal to or the nearest amount which is greater than the number to which the county is entitled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7755.

Each person receiving a Peace and Freedom Party nomination for any partisan public office at the preceding direct primary election or at any special election subsequent thereto shall be declared elected as a member of central committees. Any members elected pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the number a county is entitled to elect pursuant to Section 7752.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election [7770. - 7784.]

7770.

The state party chairperson, no later than the 135th day before the presidential primary election, shall notify the Secretary of State whether or not a county central committee election will be held. In the event that a county central committee election is not held, a county central committee will be convened pursuant to rules adopted by the party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 23.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7771.

The elections official, no later than the 115th day before the presidential primary election, shall compute the number of members of central committees to be elected in each supervisorial or Assembly district if the election of the members is to be by supervisorial or Assembly district pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 24.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7772.

In each county, the name of each candidate for member of central committees shall appear on the ballot only if she or he has done either of the following:

(a) Filed a nomination paper pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8020) to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8100), inclusive, of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 8, signed in the candidate’s behalf by
 the voters of the central committee election district in which she or he is a candidate.

(b) Qualified to have her or his name printed on the presidential primary ballot as a candidate for the Peace and Freedom Party nomination to a partisan public office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 25.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7772.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the elections official, on the 73rd day prior to the presidential primary election, finds that the number of candidates nominated for election to a central committee from any election jurisdiction does not exceed the number to be elected from that jurisdiction, the designation of the office and the names of the candidates shall not be printed on this party’s ballot in that
 jurisdiction. In lieu thereof, the board of supervisors shall declare elected the candidates who have been nominated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 26.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7773.

In counties where members of central committees are to be elected by supervisorial or Assembly district, a person seeking election as a member of central committees may seek election only in the supervisorial or Assembly district in which he or she resides.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7774.

A person qualifying as a candidate for member of central committees by virtue of qualification to have her or his name appear on the primary ballot for a partisan public office shall have her or his name listed on the ballot for member of central committees only in the central committee election district of her or his residence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7775.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a person may obtain and circulate nomination papers both for nomination to a public office and for election as a member of central committees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7776.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the number of sponsors which shall be required of a person to be a candidate for member of central committees shall be the lesser of either of the following:

(a) Not less than 20 nor more than 30.

(b) Not less than 2 percent of the number of voters registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party in the central committee election district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7777.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, up to three candidates for member of central committees in a single central committee election district may have their names listed on a single sponsor’s certificate, and the signatures thereon shall be counted toward the sponsor requirement of each and every candidate whose name is listed on the certificate. However, in no case shall the number of candidates having their names on a sponsor’s certificate exceed the number of members of central committees to be elected in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7778.

The elections official of each county shall include the office of member of central committees and the candidates therefor in a place and manner similar to the office of county central committee and the candidates therefor on various official lists.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7779.

The order of appearance of the names of the candidates for member of central committees on the ballot shall be determined by a public drawing held at the time, place, and manner prescribed for determining the order of names of county central committee members pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7780.

The office of member of central committees may be placed on the presidential primary ballot under the heading “Party Central Committees” in the place and manner designated for the office of county central committee pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13. The subheading printed under party central committees on the presidential primary ballot shall be in substantially the following form: 
Member of Peace and Freedom Party 
Central Committees, 55th Assembly District
or
Member of Peace and Freedom Party
Central Committees, Alpine County

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 27.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7781.

A party nominee for partisan office qualifying to be declared elected as a member of central committees pursuant to Section 7755 shall not be additionally declared directly elected as a member of central committees pursuant to Section 15490 and shall not possess a multiple membership on either the state central committee or on a county central committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7783.

The votes cast for each candidate for member of central committees shall be included in the canvass and statement of results in a manner similar to the vote for each candidate for county central committee pursuant to Division 15 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7784.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county central committee, in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the committee and subject to the bylaws of the state central committee, may select its members at any time by holding a caucus or convention, or by using any other method of selection approved by the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 28.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Central Committee [7800. - 7843.]



  ARTICLE 1. Members [7800. - 7805.]

7800.

At the convention meeting of the state central committee, the state central committee shall consist initially of only those members of central committees elected at the most recent presidential primary election or selected pursuant to Section 7784.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 29.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7802.

At its convention and subsequent meetings the state central committee, in its sole discretion, may appoint any additional members to the state central committee as it may desire.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7803.

The state central committee may require a balance of elected and appointed members so that 50 percent of the state central committee members from each county are women and 50 percent are men.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7804.

No person shall be appointed to membership on the state central committee unless she or he is registered as a voter affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party or would register as a voter affiliated with this party if not legally prohibited from doing so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7805.

This committee may remove any elected or appointed member who, during the term of membership, affiliates with or registers as a member of another political party, publicly advocates that the voters should not vote for the nominee of the party for any office, publicly gives support to or avows a preference for a candidate of another party or candidate who is opposed to a candidate nominated by this party, or has violated the bylaws or constitution of the state central committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Meetings [7820. - 7820.]

7820.

The state central committee shall hold meetings not less than once during each year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Business [7830. - 7843.]

7830.

The state central committee’s convention meeting shall be called to order by the chairperson of the committee at 10 a.m. on the Saturday on which it is to be held. It shall at once proceed to the election of temporary chairpeople, 50 percent of whom shall be women and 50 percent of whom shall be men. This committee may hold the election by alphabetical rollcall by county if a majority of its members vote to do so. The state central committee shall elect any other temporary officers as it may determine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7831.

The temporary chairpersons shall appoint any committees as the state central committee may direct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7832.

The convention meeting of the state central committee shall elect the officers of the state central committee and adopt the party’s platform, which shall be made public upon its adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7833.

The vote on any issue at the convention meeting of the state central committee may be by alphabetical rollcall by county if a majority of its members vote to do so, or any other method prescribed by this committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7834.

The proceedings at the convention meeting of the state central committee shall be governed by any manual of parliamentary procedure designated by this committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7835.

This committee may select from its membership an executive committee to which it may grant all or any portion of its powers and duties. If this committee grants any portion of its powers to an executive committee, it shall provide for the election to its executive committee of any number of persons it shall determine, 50 percent of whom shall be women and 50 percent of whom shall be men. All officers of the state central committee shall be members of any executive committee so selected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7836.

The chairperson of the state central committee shall serve a two-year term but shall not succeed herself or himself, and the chairperson shall alternate each biennium between the northern and southern territories. The boundary between the northern and southern territories of the state shall be that latitudinal line coinciding with the northern boundaries of San Luis Obispo, Kern, and San Bernardino Counties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7838.

All officers elected at the convention meeting of the state central committee shall serve for two-year terms, unless a shorter term is specified by the committee. Any officer of the state central committee may be removed by a majority vote of the state central committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7839.

This committee shall conduct party campaigns for this party and in behalf of the candidates of this party. It shall appoint committees and appoint and employ campaign directors and perfect whatever campaign organizations it deems suitable or desirable and for the best interest of the party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7840.

The state central committee shall have power to appoint interim county central committees in the following counties:

(a) Counties in which the voters have not elected one or more members of central committees in the presidential primary election preceding the organization of this committee.

(b) Counties in which all members of a county central committee are removed from office or cease to be registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party.

Persons appointed to interim county central committees pursuant to this section shall meet the qualifications otherwise
 required of appointees to membership on the county central committees. Notice of any appointments pursuant to this section shall be filed by the state central committee with the elections official of the county for which that interim county central committee is appointed. Interim county central committees appointed pursuant to this section shall have all the powers and privileges afforded county central committees by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 30.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7841.

A quorum of this committee is 10 percent of the entire membership, represented in person. However, the committee may make rules and regulations establishing a different quorum requirement, and any provisions so made shall supersede the provisions of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7842.

The state central committee shall designate by resolution the national political party with which the Peace and Freedom Party is affiliated, and shall file a copy of that resolution signed by the chairperson and one other officer of this committee with the Secretary of State. In the event of controversy over the national affiliation of the party, the most recent resolution filed shall be determinative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7843.

In each year of the general election at which electors of President and Vice President of the United States are to be chosen, the convention meeting of the state central committee shall also nominate as the candidates of its party as many electors of President and Vice President of the United States as the state is then entitled to, 50 percent of whom shall be women and 50 percent men, unless an odd number of electors is to be chosen, in which case the difference between the number of women and men shall be not more than one. The convention meeting shall also nominate an alternate elector for each elector chosen, for the purposes of Chapter 1.2 (commencing with Section 6911) of Part 2 of Division 6. The chairperson of the state
 central committee shall certify the name of each elector and alternate elector nominated, and the elector’s and alternate elector’s residence address to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 12.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. County Central Committee [7850. - 7884.]



  ARTICLE 1. Members [7850. - 7857.]

7850.

At its first meeting on the second Tuesday in July following the presidential primary election and at subsequent meetings, a county central committee, in its sole discretion, may appoint any additional members to the county central committee as it may desire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 31.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7851.

A county central committee may require a balance of elected and appointed committee members to create a total membership division of 50 percent women and 50 percent men.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.

No person shall be appointed to membership on a county central committee unless she or he is registered as a voter affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party in the county, or is a resident of the county who would register as a voter affiliated with this party if not legally prohibited from doing so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7853.

Any member of a committee who misses more than three consecutive regularly scheduled meetings may be removed by a vote of the committee concerned, unless the absence of the member is caused by illness or temporary absence from the county on the date of the meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7854.

The removal of residence by an elected or appointed member of a county central committee from the county from which the member was elected shall constitute the member’s automatic resignation from the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 150.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7855.

A committee may remove any elected or appointed member, who during the term of membership, affiliates with or registers as a member of another political party, publicly advocates that the voters should not vote for the nominee of the party for any office, publicly gives support to or avows a preference for a candidate of another party or candidate who is opposed to a candidate nominated by this party, or has violated the bylaws or constitution of the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7856.

Whenever any person is appointed to a committee, the chairperson of the committee shall file notices of the appointment with the county elections official and the chairperson of the state central committee within 30 days after it is made. The notices shall contain the name and address of the person appointed and shall indicate the date of the appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7857.

If no members of central committees have been elected in a county at the preceding presidential primary election or selected in a county pursuant to Section 7784, or, if for any reason all the members of a county central committee are removed from office or cease to be registered as affiliated as members of the Peace and Freedom Party, then an interim county central committee with full powers may be appointed by the state central committee under the procedures specified in Section 7840.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 32.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Meetings [7870. - 7871.]

7870.

The Department of General Services shall permit any committee that desires to do so to hold meetings in a state building within the county, at least one of which meetings each month shall be without charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7871.
